nb: Dekning av invitasjonstrykk: Dobbeltsidig (for- og bakside); Kun forside; Kun innside (brettede kort); Kun utside (brettede kort); Annet
ja: 招待状印刷のカバー範囲: 両面（表と裏）; 表面のみ; 内側のみ（二つ折りカード）; 外側のみ（二つ折りカード）; その他
pl: Zakres druku zaproszeń: Dwustronny (przód i tył); Tylko z przodu; Tylko wewnątrz (złożone karty); Tylko z zewnątrz (złożone karty); Inne
th: ขอบเขตงานพิมพ์บัตรเชิญ: พิมพ์สองด้าน (หน้าและหลัง); ด้านหน้าเท่านั้น; ด้านในเท่านั้น (การ์ดพับ); ด้านนอกเท่านั้น (การ์ดพับ); อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 邀请函印刷覆盖范围: 双面（正面和背面）; 仅正面; 仅内侧（折叠卡片）; 仅外侧（折叠卡片）; 其他
sk-SK: Rozsah potlače pozvánok: Obojstranné (predná a zadná strana); Iba predná strana; Iba vnútro (skladané karty); Iba vonkajšok (skladané karty); Iné
it: Copertura per la stampa degli inviti: Fronte/retro; Solo fronte; Solo interno (biglietti pieghevoli); Solo esterno (biglietti pieghevoli); Altro
hu: Meghívónyomtatás lefedettsége: Kétoldalas (első és hátsó oldal); Csak az első oldal; Csak a belső oldal (hajtott kártyák); Csak a külső oldal (hajtott kártyák); Egyéb
fr: Étendue d’impression de l’invitation: Double face (recto et verso); Recto uniquement; Intérieur uniquement (cartes pliées); Extérieur uniquement (cartes pliées); Autre
pt-BR: Convite cobertura de impressão: Dupla face (frente e verso); Apenas frente; Apenas parte interna (cartões dobrados); Apenas parte externa (cartões dobrados); Outra
tr: Davetiye baskı kapsamı: Çift taraflı (ön ve arka); Sadece ön; Sadece iç (katlanmış kartlar); Sadece dış (katlanmış kartlar); Diğer
fi: Kutsujen painatuksen laajuus: Kaksipuolinen (etu- ja takapuoli); Vain etupuoli; Vain sisäpuoli (taitetut kortit); Vain ulkopuoli (taitetut kortit); Muu
ko: 초대장 인쇄 커버리지: 양면(앞면 및 뒷면); 앞면 전용; 내부 전용(접이식 카드); 외부 전용(접이식 카드); 기타
sv: Trycktäckning för inbjudan: Dubbelsidig (framsida och baksida); Endast framsida; Endast insida (vikta kort); Endast utsida (vikta kort); Annat
de: Druckumfang der Einladung: Beidseitig (Vorder- & Rückseite); Nur Vorderseite; Nur Innenseite (Klappkarten); Nur Außenseite (Klappkarten); Sonstige
en: Invitation printing coverage: Double-sided (front & back); Front only; Inside only (folded cards); Outside only (folded cards); Other
el: Κάλυψη εκτύπωσης προσκλήσεων: Διπλής όψης (μπρος-πίσω); Μόνο μπροστά; Μόνο εσωτερικά (διπλωμένες κάρτες); Μόνο εξωτερικά (διπλωμένες κάρτες); Άλλο
nl: Uitnodiging bedrukking dekking: Dubbelzijdig (voor- & achterkant); Alleen voorkant; Alleen binnenkant (gevouwen kaarten); Alleen buitenkant (gevouwen kaarten); Overig
es: Cobertura de impresión de invitaciones: Doble cara (anverso y reverso); Solo anverso; Solo interior (tarjetas dobladas); Solo exterior (tarjetas dobladas); Otra
da: Trykdækning for invitationer: Dobbeltsidet (for- og bagside); Kun forside; Kun inderside (foldede kort); Kun yderside (foldede kort); Andet
vi: Phạm vi in thiệp mời: Hai mặt (trước và sau); Chỉ mặt trước; Chỉ mặt trong (thiệp gấp); Chỉ mặt ngoài (thiệp gấp); Khác
zh-TW: 邀請卡印刷範圍: 雙面 (正反面); 僅正面; 僅內側 (對折卡片); 僅外側 (對折卡片); 其他
ro-RO: Acoperire tipărire invitații: Față-verso (față și spate); Doar față; Doar la interior (felicitări pliate); Doar la exterior (felicitări pliate); Altele
pt-PT: Cobertura de impressão de convites: Frente e verso; Apenas frente; Apenas interior (cartões dobrados); Apenas exterior (cartões dobrados); Outro
cs: Pokrytí tisku pozvánek: Oboustranný (přední i zadní strana); Pouze přední strana; Pouze uvnitř (skládaná přání); Pouze zvenku (skládaná přání); Jiné
hr-HR: Pokrivenost tiskom pozivnica: Obostrano (prednja i stražnja strana); Samo prednja strana; Samo unutrašnjost (preklopne čestitke); Samo vanjski dio (preklopne čestitke); Ostalo
bg-BG: Покритие за печат на покани: Двустранно (отпред и отзад); Само отпред; Само отвътре (сгъваеми картички); Само отвън (сгъваеми картички); Друго
ru: Область печати приглашения: Двусторонний (спереди и сзади); Только спереди; Только внутри (для открыток); Только снаружи (для открыток); Другое
sl-SI: Pokritost tiskanja vabil: Obojestransko (spredaj in zadaj); Samo spredaj; Samo znotraj (zganjene kartice); Samo zunaj (zganjene kartice); Drugo
lt-LT: Kvietimo spaudos padengimas: Dvipusis (priekis ir nugara); Tik priekis; Tik vidus (atlenkiamos kortelės); Tik išorė (atlenkiamos kortelės); Kita